Maryland, session 2026, HB1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
SUBTITLE 7. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING FOR GREENHOUSE WORKERS.
4–701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BOARD” MEANS THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RELATIONS BOARD.
(C) “CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AGRICULTURAL OPERATION” MEANS AN
AGRICULTURAL OPERATION IN WHICH PLANTS ARE CULTIVATED PRIMARILY WITHIN
A GREENHOUSE OR OTHER ENCLOSED STRUCTURE WHERE TEMPERATURE AND
ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS ARE ARTIFICIALLY REGULATED.
(C) (D) (1) “EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL:
(I) EMPLOYED BY AN EMPLOYER ENGAGED IN THE BUSINESS
OF OPERATING A CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AGRICULTURAL OPERATION; AND
(II) WHOSE JOB DUTIES REQUIRE WORKING IN A GREENHOUSE
OR OTHER ENCLOSED STRUCTURE WHERE TEMPERATURE AND ENVIRONMENTAL
CONDITIONS ARE ARTIFICIALLY REGULATED.
(2) “EMPLOYEE” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE JOB
DUTIES EXCLUSIVELY INVOLVE THE PROVISION OF RETAIL SERVICES.
(D) (E) “EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION” MEANS A LABOR ORGANIZATION IN
WHICH EMPLOYEES PARTICIPATE AND THAT HAS AS ONE OF ITS PRIMARY PURPOSES
REPRESENTING EMPLOYEES.
(E) (F) “EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATION THAT HAS BEEN CERTIFIED THROUGH AN ELECTION OF EMPLOYEES

HOUSE BILL 1108 3
TO REPRESENT AND BARGAIN FOR THOSE EMPLOYEES OVER ANY TERMS AND
CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) (G) (1) “SHOWING OF INTEREST FORM” MEANS A WRITTEN
STATEMENT FROM AN EMPLOYEE WHO WISHES TO BE REPRESENTED BY A
PETITIONING EMPLOYEE FOR THE PURPOSE OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING.
(2) “SHOWING OF INTEREST FORM” INCLUDES A UNION
AUTHORIZATION CARD OR UNION MEMBERSHIP CARD.
(G) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF LABOR.
4–702.
(A) EMPLOYEES HAVE THE RIGHT TO:
(1) SELF–ORGANIZATION;
(2) FORM, JOIN, OR ASSIST AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION;
(3) BARGAIN COLLECTIVELY THROUGH AN EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE OF THEIR CHOICE;
(4) DECERTIFY AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION AS THEIR EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE;
(5) ENGAGE IN OTHER LAWFUL CONCERTED ACTIVITIES FOR THE
PURPOSE OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING; AND
(6) REFRAIN FROM ANY ACTIVITY UNDER ITEMS (1) THROUGH (4) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) THE EMPLOYER AND THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION THAT IS
CERTIFIED AS THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE SECRETARY BOARD SHALL:
(1) MEET AT REASONABLE TIMES;
(2) ENGAGE IN COLLECTIVE BARGAINING IN GOOD FAITH;
(3) MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO CONCLUDE NEGOTIATIONS WITH
A FINAL WRITTEN AGREEMENT; AND

HOUSE BILL 1108
(4) REDUCE TO WRITING ALL MATTERS AGREED ON AS A RESULT OF
NEGOTIATIONS.
(C) COLLECTIVE BARGAINING SHALL INCLUDE ALL MATTERS RELATING TO
WAGES, HOURS, AND OTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT.
(D) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT INTERFERE WITH, INTIMIDATE, RESTRAIN, OR
COERCE AN EMPLOYEE IN THE EXERCISE OF THE EMPLOYEE’S RIGHTS UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
4–703.
(A) THE SECRETARY BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING PROCEDURES FOR:
(1) DETERMINING APPROPRIATE BARGAINING UNITS;
(2) VERIFICATION OF SHOWING OF INTEREST FORMS;
(3) ELECTION OF THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE, INCLUDING BY
SECRET BALLOT, MAIL–IN BALLOT, OR ELECTRONIC BALLOT;
(4) CERTIFICATION OF THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE; AND
(5) PROCEDURES FOR RESOLVING AN IMPASSE BETWEEN THE
PARTIES.
(B) (1) THE SECRETARY BOARD MAY:
(I) INVESTIGATE AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, TAKE
APPROPRIATE ENFORCEMENT ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE
CONSISTENT WITH AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION ESTABLISHED BY ANY OTHER
PROVISION OF STATE LAW FOR LABOR DISPUTES INVOLVING EMPLOYEES OF
GOVERNMENTAL UNITS.
(2) IN THE EXERCISE OF THE AUTHORITY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY BOARD MAY NOT ASSESS A MONETARY
PENALTY.
5–1201.

HOUSE BILL 1108 5
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Heat–related illness” means a medical condition resulting from the
inability of the body to rid itself of excess heat, including heat rash, heat cramps, heat
exhaustion, heat syncope, and heat stroke.
(3) “Heat stress” means the net load to which a worker is exposed from the
combined contributions of metabolic heat, environmental factors, and clothing worn that
results in an increase in heat storage in the body, causing body temperature to rise to
sometimes dangerous levels.
(b) (1) On or before October 1, 2022, the Commissioner, in consultation with
the Maryland Occupational Safety and Health Advisory Board, shall develop and adopt
regulations that require employers to protect employees from heat–related illness caused
by heat stress.
(2) Before the Commissioner begins the process for developing and
adopting the regulations required under paragraph (1) of this subsection, Maryland
Occupational Safety and Health shall hold informational hearings in four different
geographical areas of the State for the purpose of obtaining input from interested parties.
(3) In developing the regulations required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Commissioner shall consider standards created by the National Institute
for Occupational Safety and Health, the American Conference of Governmental Industrial
Hygienists, and the American National Standards Institute.
5–1202.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AGRICULTURAL OPERATION” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–701 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “HEAT INDEX” MEANS THE APPARENT TEMPERATURE AS
DETERMINED BY A GENERALLY ACCEPTED HEAT INDEX CHART PUBLISHED BY THE
NATIONAL WEATHER SERVICE OR A SUCCESSOR STANDARD ADOPTED BY THE
SECRETARY.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN EMPLOYEE:
(1) OF AN EMPLOYER WHO OPERATES A CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT
AGRICULTURAL OPERATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1108
(2) WHOSE JOB DUTIES REQUIRE WORKING IN A GREENHOUSE OR
OTHER ENCLOSED STRUCTURE WHERE TEMPERATURE AND ENVIRONMENTAL
CONDITIONS ARE ARTIFICIALLY REGULATED.
(C) IF A REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION AND A
REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSIONER IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
5–1201 OF THIS SUBTITLE CONFLICT, THE REQUIREMENT PROVIDING GREATER
PROTECTION TO AN EMPLOYEE SHALL PREVAIL TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
(D) EACH EMPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE EMPLOYEES WITH PAID REST BREAKS
OF NOT LESS THAN 5 MINUTES FOR EACH HOUR THAT THE HEAT INDEX INSIDE A
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AGRICULTURAL OPERATION REACHES AND
MAINTAINS AT LEAST 90 DEGREES FAHRENHEIT.
(E) A REST BREAK PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL BE COMPENSATED AS WORKING TIME PAID AT THE
EMPLOYEE’S REGULAR RATE OF PAY UNLESS THE BREAK COINCIDES WITH AN
OTHERWISE UNPAID MEAL PERIOD; AND
(2) MAY BE PROVIDED CONCURRENTLY WITH ANY OTHER REST
BREAK REQUIRED UNDER ANY OTHER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.
Article – State Government
22–306.
(a) The Board is responsible for administering and enforcing provisions of:
(1) this title;
(2) Title 6, Subtitles 4 and 5 of the Education Article;
(3) Title 16, Subtitle 7 of the Education Article; [and]
(4) Title 3 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article; AND
(5) TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.